Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 1
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Cross references:

For creation of the department of agriculture and the transfer to that department of the state agricultural commission, the office of commissioner of agriculture, and other divisions, authorities, boards, or bureaus, under the "Administrative Organization Act of 1968", see § 24-1-123.

Section

35-1-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "State Department of Agriculture Act of 1949".

Source:

L. 49:

p. 185, § 1.

CSA:

C. 5, § 13(3).

CRS 53:

§ 6-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-1-1.

35-1-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agriculture" means the science and art of production of plants and animals useful to man, including, to a variable extent, the preparation of these products for man's use and their disposal by marketing or otherwise, and includes horticulture, floriculture, viticulture, forestry, dairy, livestock, poultry, bee, and any and all forms of farm products and farm production.

(1.5) Repealed.

"Commission" means the state agricultural commission.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Division" means a primary subdivision of the department whose administrative head is directly responsible to the head of the department.

"Livestock" means cattle, sheep, goats, swine, mules, poultry, horses, alternative livestock, as defined in section 35-41.5-102 (1), and such domesticated animals as fox, mink, marten, chinchilla, beaver, and rabbits, and all other animals raised or kept for profit.

"Section" means a subdivision of a division whose administrative head is directly responsible to the head of the division.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 185, § 2.

CSA:

C. 5, § 13(4).

CRS 53:

§ 6-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-1-2.

L. 94:

(1.5) added and (6) amended, p. 1697, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1.5) amended, p. 533, § 2, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1.5)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (1.5), effective July 1, 2009. (See L. 99, p. 533.)

35-1-103. Department of agriculture.

There is hereby created a department of agriculture, referred to in this article as the "department". When any law of this state refers to the state department of agriculture, said law shall be construed as referring to the department of agriculture.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 186, § 3.

CSA:

C. 5, § 13(5).

CRS 53:

§ 6-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-1-3.

L. 68:

p. 127, § 135.

35-1-104. Functions, powers, and duties - rules - repeal.

The department has and shall exercise the following functions, powers, and duties:

To inquire into the needs of agriculture of the state and make appropriate recommendations to the governor and the general assembly, except as to functions specifically assigned under state law to other state agencies;

To perform all regulatory and inspection services relating to agriculture, except agricultural education and research and those regulatory functions relating primarily to the control of milk or milk products or assigned by law to other state agencies;

To make investigations, conduct hearings, and make recommendations concerning all matters as related to the powers, duties, and functions as provided in this article;

To cooperate with the United States department of agriculture in getting and disseminating production statistics, market and trade information concerning demand, supply, prevailing prices, and commercial movements of agricultural products and extent of products in storage, and cooperate with any other state or federal agency which in any manner may be helpful to agriculture;

To annually fix such inspection and license fees and service charges within maximum limits provided by law as may be necessary to pay the cost of service performed and reasonable reserves for contingencies, including cost of depository, accounting, disbursement, auditing, and rental of quarters and facilities furnished by the state;

To foster and encourage the standardizing, grading, inspection, labeling, handling, storage, and marketing of agricultural products and, after investigation and public hearings thereon, acting in cooperation with the United States department of agriculture, to establish and promulgate standard grades and other standard classifications of and for agricultural products, except milk or milk products;

To extend in every practicable way the distribution and sale of Colorado agricultural products throughout the markets of the world;

To promote, in the interest of the producer, the distributor, and the consumer, the economical and efficient distribution of agricultural products of this state and to that end cooperate with the department of commerce of the United States and any other department or agency of the federal government;

To promote, within existing appropriations, farmers' markets located within the state, including support or development of farmers' market organizations and working groups and the provision of education, outreach, and other assistance;

To obtain and furnish information relating to the selection of shipping routes, adoption of shipping methods, or avoidance of delays in the transportation of agricultural products or helpful in the solution of other transportation problems connected with the distribution of agricultural products;

To act as adviser to producers and distributors, when requested, and to assist them in the economical and efficient distribution of their agricultural product;

To foster and encourage cooperation between producers and distributors in the interest of the general public;

To act as a mediator or arbitrator in any controversy or issue that may arise between producers and distributors of any agricultural products concerning the grade or classification of such products;

To determine for the protection of owners, buyers, creditors, or other interested parties the validity of warehouse receipts for any such products by verifying quantities, grade, and classification thereof;

To enforce the state laws or regulations relating to fruit and vegetable inspection and grading; spray residue inspection and removal; the registration, inspection, and analysis of commercial feeding stuffs; the licensing of commission merchants, produce dealers, brokers, and agents handling agricultural products; the inspection and grading of poultry and eggs; the inspection of warehouses and frozen food locker plants; the inspection of commercial fertilizers; the control of plant and insect pests and diseases; the control and eradication of noxious and poisonous weeds; the inspection and sale of seeds; the control of contagious and infectious livestock diseases; and all other regulatory laws relating to agriculture;

To inspect any nursery, orchard, farm garden, park, cemetery, greenhouse, or any private or public place which may become infested or infected with harmful insects, plant diseases, noxious or poisonous weeds, or other agricultural pests; to establish and enforce quarantines; to issue and enforce orders and regulations for the control and eradication of said pests, wherever they may exist within the state; to perform such other duties relating to plants and plant products as may seem advisable and not contrary to law; and to inspect apiaries for diseases inimical to bees and beekeeping and enforce the laws relating thereto;

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

To license and inspect locker plants and enforce standards of construction and operation;

To offer and award suitable premiums on livestock at the national western stock show;

To take charge of the exhibition of Colorado agricultural products at international or national expositions;

To cooperate with the United States department of agriculture or any other federal agency in control and eradication activities and programs involving predatory animals and rodent pests, plant diseases and insect pests, and noxious and poisonous weeds and to cooperate in the enforcement of the provisions of the federal seed act governing the movement of seeds in interstate commerce;

To serve as the state agency to carry out the policies and purposes of the "Colorado Agricultural Conservation and Adjustment Act" and to promote and administer state plans for the same;

Repealed.

On approval of the governor, to coordinate the management and operation of farms of state institutions and the exchange of agricultural products and equipment between state institutions;

(aa.1) To promulgate rules to specify the varieties of rapeseed, also known as canola, produced in the state and the geographical locations where each variety may be produced or stored, to establish districts and require registration of fields producing rapeseed with the appropriate district, and to enforce the provisions of this paragraph (aa.1) by requiring a producer to take appropriate action necessary to prevent cross-pollination, establishing reasonable penalties or costs or both, and determining and collecting the actual costs to be recovered from the producers to offset the cash funds expended for services performed by the department in the administration of this paragraph (aa.1);

(aa.2) To promulgate rules specifying the class of strawberries allowed for production of nursery stock in the state and the geographical locations where each class may be produced, establishing districts and requiring registration of fields producing strawberries with the appropriate district, and enforcing the provisions of this paragraph (aa.2) by requiring a producer to take appropriate actions necessary to prevent the introduction of diseases and pests, establishing reasonable penalties or costs or both, and determining and collecting the actual costs to be recovered from the producers to offset the cash funds expended for services performed by the department in the administration of this paragraph (aa.2);

(aa.3) To identify agricultural management areas in the state and to develop best management practices pursuant to section 25-8-205.5 (3), C.R.S., and to assist the commissioner in the promulgation of any rules and regulations authorized pursuant to said section;

Such other and additional functions, powers, and duties as may be provided by law;

To solicit grants, donations, and gifts for the purpose of funding noxious weed management projects, as described in section 35-5.5-116. Such moneys shall be transferred to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the noxious weed management fund.

For each division, section, program, or established funding source of the department, to solicit, receive, and spend grants, donations, and gifts. Such moneys shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the particular cash fund or established funding source deemed most appropriate by the department.

Repealed.

(I) To implement voluntary soil health programs.

(II) No later than January 31 of each year, the department shall prepare and make available to the public a report on its official website that must contain the following information for the previous year:

An accounting of all money received and spent for the purpose enumerated in subsection (1)(ff)(I) of this section; and

A description of activities undertaken, including the number and type of grant-funded projects and the educational and stakeholder engagement activities.

(III) Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I):

(A) No later than January 31 of each year, the department shall submit the report prepared in accordance with subsection (1)(ff)(II) of this section to the agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and the agriculture, livestock, and water committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees; and

(B) The department shall annually report on its activities under this subsection (1)(ff) at the hearing required by the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2.

(IV) This subsection (1)(ff) is repealed, effective December 31, 2022.

Whenever any law provides for issuance or renewal by the department of any license, permit, certificate, registration, or other form of authorization and such law provides for specific dates for the issuance, renewal, or expiration of the same, notwithstanding the provisions of any such laws, and in order to promote efficiency and avoid duplication of effort, the department may, by rule and regulation, establish dates for such issuance, renewal, or expiration different from those established by law; but in no case shall the department change the duration or period of time during which any license, permit, certificate, registration, or other form of authorization may be valid or effective as established by law, unless otherwise provided.

Whenever a specific law provides for the renewal by the department of any license previously issued and provides a license renewal fee to be paid by the applicant therefor, upon the issuance of any such renewal license after the applicable renewal date, the applicant shall pay in addition to the renewal fee a penalty in an amount equal to the said renewal fee, but not to exceed twenty-five dollars. The provisions of this subsection (3) shall not apply to articles 14 and 21 of this title 35, nor to any other specific law that provides for a penalty for the issuance of a license, permit, or registration after the applicable renewal date.

To the extent its costs are repaid by gifts, grants, or donations received pursuant to section 35-1-107 (6), and only to that extent, the department may provide educational programs and materials regarding any activity regulated under articles 12, 13, 14, 21, 33, 36, and 60 of this title 35.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 186, § 4.

CSA:

C. 5, § 13(6).

CRS 53:

§ 6-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-1-4.

L. 69:

pp. 107, 108, §§ 1, 3.

L. 73:

p. 193, § 1.

L. 82:

(1)(z) repealed, p. 537, § 15, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 85:

(1)(b), (1)(f), and (1)(n) amended and (1)(p) to (1)(t) repealed, pp. 901, 902, §§ 3, 4, effective April 5.

L. 87:

(1)(aa.1) added, p. 1276, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 90:

(1)(aa.3) added, p. 1334, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1)(cc) added, p. 763, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

(4) added, p. 1723, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2004:

(1)(aa.2) added, p. 1049, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

(1)(dd) added, p. 17, § 1, effective March 6.

L. 2007:

(1)(ee) added, p. 1228, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

(1)(h.5) added, (SB 12-048), ch. 16, p. 44, § 6, effective March 15.

L. 2017:

(1)(ee) repealed, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1414, § 106, effective May 25; (4) amended, (SB 17-225), ch. 262, p. 1246, § 7, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1717, § 71, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 19-1114), ch. 74, p. 270, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(4) amended, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 754, § 7, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

(1)(ff) added, (SB 21-235), ch. 232, p. 1228, § 2, effective June 15.

Cross references:

(1) For rule-making and licensing procedures, see article 4 of title 24; for the "Colorado Agricultural Conservation and Adjustment Act", see article 3 of this title 35; for the noxious weed management fund, see § 35-5.5-116; for the "Federal Seed Act", see 7 U.S.C. § 1551 et seq.

(2) For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act adding subsection (1)(h.5), see section 1 of chapter 16, Session Laws of Colorado 2012. For the legislative declaration in SB 21-235, see section 1 of chapter 232, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

35-1-104.5. Agricultural workforce development program - legislative declaration - creation - rules - repeal.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Finding qualified and trained agricultural employees is a significant challenge for agricultural businesses. It is especially difficult to provide training and experience to young and beginning farmers and ranchers.

The barriers to entry for young and beginning farmers and ranchers are significant. Among these barriers are access to training programs that provide real-world work experience.

Internships are a recognized way to build a talent pipeline and career pathway to align education, training, and work-based learning; and

By offering incentives to agricultural businesses to create internships, there will be more opportunities for students to obtain work experience in agriculture.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules by January 1, 2019, creating the agricultural workforce development program to provide incentives to agricultural businesses to hire interns through partial reimbursement of internship costs. The rules must specify, at a minimum:

The criteria for selecting an agricultural business for participation in the program, including the ability of the business to effectively supervise an intern and the opportunity for an intern to get meaningful work experience;

The criteria for an internship to qualify under the program, including the following:

The internship must provide an intern at least one hundred thirty hours of work experience; and

The internship cannot exceed six months in duration per intern;

The criteria for an agricultural business to use in selecting qualified interns, including the required educational experience for an intern and the ability of the intern to perform meaningful work for the business;

The process and timetable for selecting qualified businesses and qualified interns;

The accounting requirements for tracking internship costs; and

The process for a business to seek reimbursement.

Subject to appropriation, the department may reimburse a qualified business an amount not to exceed fifty percent of the actual cost to the business to employ the intern. Actual cost includes the wages paid to the intern, a reasonable allocation of fixed overhead expenses, and all incidental costs directly related to the internship. Based on the annual appropriation for the program, the commissioner shall determine how many internships may be approved, the amount of reimbursement per internship, and whether a business may be reimbursed for more than one intern in the same fiscal year. However, no business may be reimbursed for more than three internships in the same fiscal year.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-042), ch. 231, p. 1446, § 1, effective August 8.

35-1-104.7. Colorado agricultural workforce services program - online resource portal - definitions.

The Colorado agricultural workforce services program is created in the department. The program includes the online resource portal described in subsection (3) of this section.

The department shall administer the program in accordance with this section.

As part of the program, the department may establish on its official website a publicly available page that includes a portal to resources for use by agricultural employees and agricultural employers. The department shall ensure that the resources of the portal are available in both English and Spanish.

For the purposes of the online portal described in this subsection (3), the department may curate video modules and other resources to help agricultural employers comply with labor laws, including the sections specified in subsection (3)(d)(II) of this section, and help agricultural employees understand the rights they are afforded, including links to relevant state agencies and nongovernmental organizations.

The department may include in the online portal information and resources concerning:

Agricultural employee safety and working conditions;

Agricultural employee labor rights;

Mental health;

Agricultural employers' labor requirements; and

Other resources for agricultural employees or agricultural employers.

The department shall include in the online portal information regarding:

A wage and hour calculator; and

The requirements of sections 8-6-101.5, 8-6-120, 8-13.5-202, 8-13.5-203, and 8-14.4-109.

In establishing and maintaining the online portal described in this subsection (3), the department may consult with the Colorado cooperative extension service described in part 7 of article 31 of title 23.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate one hundred thousand dollars from the general fund to the department to implement the online resource portal described in subsection (3) of this section. Any unused money does not revert to the general fund but is continuously appropriated to the department.

The department is authorized to seek, solicit, accept, and expend gifts, grants, and donations for the purposes of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agricultural employee" has the meaning set forth in section 8-2-206 (1)(b).

"Agricultural employer" has the meaning set forth in section 8-3-104 (1).

"Program" means the Colorado agricultural workforce services program created in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1308), ch. 368, p. 2621, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1308, see section 1 of chapter 368, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

35-1-105. State agricultural commission - creation - composition.

There is created the state agricultural commission, referred to in this article 1 as the "commission", which consists of nine members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, for terms of four years. Of such members, one member must be appointed from each of the four agricultural districts, as defined in subsection (3) of this section, and five members must be appointed from the state at large; except that no more than three members may be appointed from any one agricultural district. No more than five of the nine members may be affiliated with the same political party. The commission is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

The members of the commission shall be appointed from persons who are currently or were previously actively engaged in the business of agriculture and allied activities, but a majority of the commission shall be appointed from persons actively engaged in the business of agriculture in such a manner that representation of no agricultural commodity organization constitutes a majority of the commission. A vacancy on the commission shall be filled by the governor by the appointment of a qualified person.

For the purposes of representation on the state agricultural commission, this state is divided into four agricultural districts as follows:

The city and county of Denver and the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Douglas, and Jefferson constitute the first district.

The counties of Boulder, Cheyenne, Clear Creek, Elbert, Gilpin, Kit Carson, Larimer, Lincoln, Logan, Morgan, Phillips, Sedgwick, Washington, Weld, and Yuma constitute the second district.

The counties of Alamosa, Baca, Bent, Conejos, Costilla, Crowley, Custer, El Paso, Fremont, Huerfano, Kiowa, Las Animas, Mineral, Otero, Prowers, Pueblo, Rio Grande, Saguache, and Teller constitute the third district.

The counties of Archuleta, Chaffee, Delta, Dolores, Eagle, Garfield, Grand, Gunnison, Hinsdale, Jackson, Lake, La Plata, Mesa, Moffat, Montezuma, Montrose, Ouray, Park, Pitkin, Rio Blanco, Routt, San Juan, San Miguel, and Summit constitute the fourth district.

The commission shall elect from its members a chair, vice-chair, and such other commission officers as it shall determine. The commissioner of agriculture, in the discretion of the commission, may serve as secretary of the commission but shall not be eligible to appointment as a member. All commission officers hold their offices at the pleasure of the commission. Regular meetings of the commission shall be held not less than once every three months at such times as may be fixed by resolution of the commission. Special meetings may be called by the chair, by the commissioner, or by a majority of members of the commission at any time on at least three days' prior notice by mail or, in cases of emergency, on twenty-four hours' notice by telephone or other telecommunications device. The commission shall adopt, and at any time may amend, bylaws in relation to its meetings and the transaction of its business. A majority shall constitute a quorum of the commission. Members serve without compensation but are entitled to be reimbursed for their actual and necessary traveling and subsistence expenses when absent from their places of residence in attendance at meetings.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 190, § 5.

CSA:

C. 5, § 13(7).

CRS 53:

§ 6-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-1-5.

L. 65:

p. 175, § 1.

L. 68:

p. 127, § 136.

L. 83:

(1)(c)(I) and (1)(c)(II) amended, p. 1310, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 631, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1696, § 105, effective August 7.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 77, § 105, effective February 25; (1)(a) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3402, § 145, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section and subsection (1)(a) by SB 22-013 and SB 22-162 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

35-1-106. Powers and duties of commission.

In addition to all other powers and duties conferred upon the commission by this article 1, the commission has the following specific powers and duties:

To formulate the general policy with respect to the management of the department of agriculture and the general policy with respect to the enforcement of regulatory and service laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to agriculture;

To make or cause to be made, within the limits of appropriations, such studies as it deems necessary to guide the commissioner concerning the agricultural policy of this state;

To advise and make recommendations to the governor and the general assembly on matters pertaining to agriculture within this state;

To require the preparation and transmittal by the commissioner of an annual departmental report and to establish publication policies for the department in accordance with the provisions of section

24-1-136

, C.R.S.;

To furnish the commissioner with advice on any agricultural or livestock problem with which he may be confronted;

To promulgate and adopt all department of agriculture budgets for submission to the controller of this state in accordance with law and to approve and pass upon all annual budgets for expenditures of money from the various funds of the department and to review such budgets at each meeting of the commission;

To approve prior to their release all rules and regulations issued by the commissioner and considered necessary and proper to carry out the provisions of this article;

To hold hearings, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and take testimony in all matters relating to the exercise and performance of the powers and duties of the commission. Upon the failure or refusal of any witness to obey any subpoena, the commission may petition the district court, and, upon proper showing, the court may order a witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey the order of the court shall be punishable as contempt of court.

To establish and appoint, as it may deem necessary or advisable, such advisory committees from the groups affected to advise and confer with the commission or the commissioner concerning aspects of agricultural or livestock products, marketing, disease, or any other pertinent matter;

If not already required by law, to require and fix the bonds of such employees of the department as may be deemed necessary;

To avoid duplication of effort within the department and to clarify responsibilities under this title 35 (except part 2 of article 7 and articles 14, 42, 51, 65, 70, and 72) and article 24 of title 30; to enter into cooperative agreements with the state board of health, the board of governors of the Colorado state university system, or any other state board or commission that is authorized by law to perform like or similar duties to those delegated by law to this commission, wherein it shall be prescribed whether this commission, the state board of health, the board of governors of the Colorado state university system, or such other state board or commission shall perform and be responsible for the performance of the duties mentioned in the agreements, so that there is no duplication of effort as between this commission and the state board of health, the board of governors of the Colorado state university system, or any other state board or commission; and to enter into agreements with the state board of health, the board of governors of the Colorado state university system, or any other state board or commission relative to the cooperative use by this commission of any laboratories, equipment, or facilities owned or used by this commission or any other state board or commission;

To employ any person, partnership, or corporation for services in carrying out the provisions of this title 35 (except part 2 of article 7 and articles 14, 42, 51, 65, 70, and 72) and article 24 of title 30, and not inconsistent with section 13 of article XII of the state constitution or to provide information, statistics, or data deemed beneficial by the commission to livestock and agriculture in the state of Colorado;

The commission shall act only by resolution adopted at a duly called meeting of the commission, and no individual member of the commission shall exercise individually any administrative authority with respect to the department;

To comply with the requirements of section

24-1-136.5

, C.R.S., concerning the preparation of operational master plans, facilities master plans, and facilities program plans, as if the commission were the executive director of the department;

To promulgate rules requiring the owners of alternative livestock, as defined in section

35-41.5-102 (1)

, to obtain certification showing that the alternative livestock herd meets the requirements of a tuberculosis surveillance plan approved by the state veterinarian and meets regulations pertaining to the control of infectious diseases and parasites as determined by the department. This paragraph (o) shall not apply if the owner of the alternative livestock is a zoological park that is accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association; except that any intrastate transfer of alternative livestock by a zoological park that is accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association to any person or entity that is not accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association is subject to the rules of the commission adopted under this paragraph (o).

In consultation with interested industry groups, to fix, assess, and collect fees in amounts sufficient to recover the department's direct and indirect costs incurred in carrying out and enforcing the provisions of articles 12, 13, 14, 33, 36, and 60 of this title 35, part 1 of article 21 of this title 35, and part 2 of article 43 of this title 35.

Fees established pursuant to this paragraph (p) that exceed the amount of any corresponding fees that were in effect as of April 1, 2003, and any new or additional fees established after April 1, 2003, shall be reported, on or before December 1 of each year, to the agriculture, natural resources and energy committee of the senate and the agriculture, livestock, and natural resources committee of the house of representatives.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1902, § 1, effective July 1, 2007.)

The parks and wildlife commission shall review the rules concerning alternative livestock proposed by the commission pursuant to paragraph (o) of subsection (1) of this section and shall make recommendations to the commission concerning such rules. The commission shall not adopt or implement rules concerning alternative livestock that impact native big game wildlife without the prior approval of the parks and wildlife commission. In addition, the parks and wildlife commission may propose rules to the commission designed to protect native big game wildlife.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 191, § 6.

CSA:

C. 5, § 13(8).

CRS 53:

§ 6-1-6.

L. 55:

p. 132, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-1-6.

L. 64:

p. 122, § 21.

L. 68:

p. 127, § 137.

L. 69:

p. 108, § 3.

L. 83:

(1)(d) amended, p. 841, § 67, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(n) added, p. 566, § 16, effective April 6; (1)(o) and (2) added, p. 1697, §§ 4, 5, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(o) amended, p. 18, § 2, effective March 9.

L. 2002:

(1)(k) amended, p. 1247, § 23, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(1)(p) added, p. 1723, § 2, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(1)(p)(III) amended, p. 1267, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

IP(1) and (1)(p)(III) amended, p. 1902, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1235, § 92, effective June 4.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(k), and (1)(l) amended, (SB 17-225), ch. 262, p. 1246, § 8, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(p)(I) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1718, § 72, effective May 29.

L. 2020:

(1)(p)(I) amended, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 754, § 8, effective June 29; (1)(p)(I) amended, (HB 20-1343), ch. 217, p. 1076, § 2, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(p)(I) by HB 20-1213 and HB 20-1343 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the state personnel system, see § 13 of article XII of the state constitution.

35-1-106.3. Plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund - creation.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund.

All revenues collected in pursuit of the department's efforts in relation to plant health, pest control, and environmental protection shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund. The commission may establish a fee schedule to cover the direct and indirect costs of the collection and distribution of beneficial insects.

The plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund consists of any fees, fines, or penalties collected pursuant to articles 4, 9, 10, 11, 11.5, 25, 26, 27, and 27.5 of this title 35; any fees, fines, or penalties collected pursuant to article 8 of title 25; any fees collected under article 12 of this title 35 for the purpose of funding state waters protection activities; and all revenues collected in pursuit of the department's efforts to conduct biological pest control. The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of implementing, administering, and enforcing articles 4, 9, 10, 11, 11.5, 25, 26, 27, and 27.5 of this title 35 and of article 8 of title 25; except that any appropriation for the indirect costs of issuing chemigation permits pursuant to section 35-11-106 must not exceed the amount specified in section 35-11-106 (3)(b). Any money from the fund that is allocated for biological pest control must supplement any general fund money appropriated for that purpose.

All interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund shall be credited to the fund. At the end of each fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund; except that the state treasurer shall transfer any unexpended and unencumbered money that is requested by the commissioner to be transferred from the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund to the emergency invasive-pest response fund created in section 35-1-106.4.

In accordance with section 24-75-402 (3)(c), C.R.S., the alternative maximum reserve for the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund is fifty percent of the amount expended from the fund during each fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 314, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(5) amended, (HB 15-1261), ch. 322, p. 1314, § 8, effective June 5.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (SB 19-186), ch. 422, p. 3689, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (HB 21-1045), ch. 160, p. 910, § 1, effective September 7.

35-1-106.4. Emergency invasive-pest response fund.

The emergency invasive-pest response fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of:

Money transferred to the fund in accordance with section 35-1-106.3 (4);

Money from remuneration authorized in section 35-4-118;

Gifts, grants, and donations received under subsection (4) of this section; and

Any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the commissioner may expend money from the fund to:

Implement sections 35-4-118 and 35-4-119; and

Implement emergency measures to control or eradicate invasive pests.

The commissioner may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section.

The department shall report annually the amount and source of money received under this section in the prior fiscal year at the hearing required by the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1045), ch. 160, p. 910, § 2, effective September 7.